cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Posilování s činkami > Přílušenství k činkám: Zvedáky na činky; Chrániče na osu; Činky a posilovací tyče; Stojan na činky; Objímky pro činky; Posilovací řetězy; Háky a gripy na cvičení
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Vzpieranie > Vzpieračské činky: Nízke stojany na činky; Podložky pod činky; Činky a vzpieračské tyče; Stojany na uloženie činiek; Manžety na vzpieračské tyče; Vzpieračské reťaze; Háky a úchyty na posilňovanie
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Ağırlık Kaldırma > Serbest Ağırlık Aksesuarları: Bar krikoları; Halter barı süngerleri; Halterler ve Halter Barları; Serbest Ağırlık Saklama Rafları; Ağırlık Barı Kelepçeleri; Ağırlık kaldırma zincirleri; Ağırlık kaldırma kancaları ve tutacakları
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Cử tạ > Phụ kiện tạ tay: Kích nâng đòn tạ; Mút đệm gánh tạ; Thanh tạ & thanh cử tạ; Giá cất giữ tạ đơn; Khóa thanh tạ; Dây xích tập tạ; Móc & quấn cổ tay tập tạ
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Styrketräning > Tillbehör till fria vikter: Skivstångsdomkrafter; Skivstångskuddar; Skivor och tyngdlyftningsstänger; Ställ för hantlar och viktskivor; Lås till viktstänger; Lyftkedjor; Lyftkrokar och grepp
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Dizanje utega > Dodaci za podesive utege: Barbell jack; Štitnici za šipku; Šipke za dizanje utega; Police za skladištenje utega; Stezaljke za utege; Lanci za dizanje utega; Kuke i hvataljke za dizanje utega
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ยกน้ำหนัก > อุปกรณ์ฟรีเวท: แม่แรงยกบาร์เบล; เบาะรองบาร์เบล; บาร์เบลและบาร์ยกน้ำหนัก; ชั้นวางอุปกรณ์ฟรีเวท; ตัวล็อกดัมเบล; โซ่ยกน้ำหนัก; ตะขอและกริปยกน้ำหนัก
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Podnoszenie ciężarów > Akcesoria do wolnych ciężarów: Podnośniki do sztang; Ochraniacze na gryf sztangi; Sztangi i pręty do sztang; Stojaki na ciężary; Mocowania do sztang; Łańcuchy treningowe; Haki i uchwyty treningowe
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Levantamiento de pesas > Accesorios para pesas libres: Gatos para barras de pesas; Almohadillas para barras de pesas; Pesas y barras de halterofilia; Estantes de almacenamiento de pesas libres; Anillas de cierre para barras de pesas; Cadenas para levantamiento de pesas; Ganchos y agarres para levantamiento de pesas
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Halterofilismo > Acessórios de pesos livres: Macacos para barras de musculação; Almofadas para barras de musculação; Barras de halteres e barras de levantamento de peso; Suportes de armazenamento de pesos livres; Grampos para barra de musculação; Correntes de musculação; Ganchos e pegas de musculação
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ウェイトリフティング・重量挙げ > フリーウエイト関連用品: バーベルジャッキ; バーベルパッド; バーベル・ウェイトリフティングバー; フリーウエイト収納ラック; バーベルカラー; ウェイトリフティングチェーン; ウェイトリフティング用フック・グリップ
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Súlyemelés > Szabadsúly-kiegészítők: Súlyzórúd-emelők; Súlyzórúd-párnák; Súlyzók és súlyemelő rudak; Szabadsúly-tárolóállványok; Súlyzórúdrögzítő gallér; Súlyemelő láncok; Súlyemelő horgok és markolatok
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Painonnosto > Vapaiden painojen lisätarvikkeet: Levytankonostimet; Levytankojen pehmusteet; Levytangot ja painonnostotangot; Vapaiden painojen säilytyshyllyt; Painonnostotankojen lukot; Nostoketjut; Vetokoukut ja otevoimatuet
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 역기 운동 > 프리웨이트 부대용품: 바벨 잭; 바벨 패드; 바벨/역도용 바; 프리웨이트 보관대; 웨이트 바 칼라; 역도용 체인; 역도용 훅 및 그립
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Sunkioji atletika > Laisvųjų svarsčių priedai: Štangų keltuvai; Štangos pagalvėlės; Štangų grifai; Laisvųjų svarsčių laikymo lentynos; Grifų spynos; Svarmenų kilnojimo grandinės; Svorio kilnojimo kabliai ir rankenos
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Levantamento de peso > Acessórios de pesos: Macacos para barras de peso; Protetores de barra; Halteres e barras de levantamento de peso; Estantes para pesos livres; Presilhas para barras de musculação; Correntes para levantamento de peso; Ganchos e grips para levantamento de peso
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Тяжелая атлетика > Аксессуары для свободных весов: Домкраты для штанги; Накладки на гриф; Грифы для штанг и гантелей; Стойки для хранения свободных весов; Замки для грифов; Цепи для отягощения; Крюки и накладки для тяги
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 举重 > 哑铃/杠铃配件: 杠铃起杠器; 杠铃护肩垫; 杠铃/举重杆; 哑铃架; 杠铃杆护圈卡头; 举重训练链条; 举重助力钩与握力带
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Vægtløftning > Håndvægte – tilbehør: Vægtstangsløftere; Puder til vægtstænger; Vægtstænger og vægtkugler; Stativer til frivægte; Kraver til vægtstænger; Træningskæder til vægtløftning; Kroge og greb til vægtløftning
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Weight Lifting > Free Weight Accessories: Barbell Jacks; Barbell Pads; Barbells & Weightlifting Bars; Free Weight Storage Racks; Weight Bar Collars; Weight Lifting Chains; Weight Lifting Hooks & Grips
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 舉重 > 自由重量健身配件: 槓鈴起槓器; 槓鈴護頸墊; 槓鈴和舉重桿; 自由重量訓練器材架; 舉重桿鎖扣; 舉重鐵鍊; 舉重助力鉤與握力帶
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Gewichtheben > Hantelzubehör: Langhantel-Heber; Langhantelpolster; Langhanteln & Hantelstangen; Hantelständer; Hantelstangen-Feststellringe; Gewichtheber-Ketten; Gewichtheber-Haken & -Griffe
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Haltérophilie > Accessoires de musculation avec des poids libres: Crics pour barres de musculation; Manchons pour barres de musculation; Haltères et barres d’haltérophilie; Rack de rangement pour poids libres; Colliers d’haltères; Chaînes d’haltérophilie; Crochets et sangles de tirage
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Ridicare de greutăți > Accesorii pentru greutăți libere: Cricuri pentru bare de haltere; Perne pentru bara de haltere; Bare olimpice și bare pentru ridicare de greutăți; Suporturi pentru depozitare greutăți libere; Cleme pentru bare pentru greutăți; Lanțuri pentru haltere; Cârlige și prinderi pentru haltere
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Dvigovanje uteži > Dodatki za proste uteži: Dvigalke za uteži na palici; Ščitniki za uteži; Dvoročne palice in palice za dvigovanje uteži; Stojala za shranjevanje prostih uteži; Varnostne sponke za utežne palice; Verige za dvigovanje uteži; Kavlji in ročaji za dvigovanje uteži
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Gewichtheffen > Accessoires voor gewichtheffen: Barbell jacks; Halterstangkussens; Barbells en staven voor gewichtheffen; Opslagrekken voor losse gewichten; Sluiters voor halterstangen; Gewichthefkettingen; Gewichthefhaken en -grips
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Άρση βαρών > Αξεσουάρ ελεύθερων βαρών: Γρύλοι μπάρας; Μαξιλαράκια μπάρας; Μονόζυγα και μπάρες άρσης βαρών; Ράφια αποθήκευσης ελεύθερων βαρών; Σφιγκτήρες μπάρας βαρών; Αλυσίδες άρσης βαρών; Γάντζοι και λαβές άρσης βαρών
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Вдигане на тежести > Аксесоари за свободни тежести: Лостове за повдигане на щанга; Подложки за щанги; Щанги и лостове за вдигане на тежести; Стелажи за съхранение на свободни тежести; Щипки за лост за тежести; Вериги за вдигане на тежести; Куки и ръкохватки за вдигане на тежести
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Vektløfting > Frivektstilbehør: Vektstangjekker; Nakkeputer for vektstenger; Vekter og vektløftingsstenger; Lagringsstativer for frivekter; Vektstanghylser; Løftekjettinger; Løftekroker og -grep
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Sollevamento pesi > Accessori per massa muscolare: Cric per bilancieri; Imbottiture per bilancieri; Bilancieri e barre per sollevamento pesi; Rastrelliere per pesi liberi; Bloccadischi per bilancieri; Catene per sollevamento pesi; Ganci e prese per sollevamento pesi